California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Student Organizations [76060. - 76067.]

76060.

The governing board of a community college district may authorize the students of a college to organize a student body association. The association shall encourage students to participate in the governance of the college and may conduct any activities, including fundraising activities, as may be approved by the appropriate college officials. The association may be granted the use of community college premises and properties without charge, subject to any regulations that may be established by the governing board of the community college district.

The governing board of the community college district may authorize the students of a college to organize more than one student body association when the governing board finds that day students and evening students each need an association or geographic circumstances make the organization of only one student body association impractical or inconvenient.

A community college district may assume responsibility for activities formerly conducted by a student body association if the student body association is dissolved. A student body association employee who was employed to perform the activity assumed by the district pursuant to this section shall become a member of the classified service of the district in accordance with Section 88020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1238, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76060.5.

(a) If a student body association has been established at a community college as authorized by Section 76060, a student representation fee of two dollars ($2) shall be collected by the officials of the community college, together with all other fees, at the time of registration or before registration and shall be deposited in a separate fiduciary fund established per the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual for student representation fees. The money collected pursuant to this section shall be expended to provide support for governmental affairs representatives of local or statewide student body organizations who may be stating their positions and viewpoints before city, county, and district governments, and before
 offices and agencies of state government.

(b) (1) One dollar ($1) of every two-dollar ($2) fee collected shall be expended to establish and support the operations of a statewide community college student organization, recognized by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, with effective student representation and participation in state-level community college shared governance and with governmental affairs representatives to advocate before the Legislature and other state and local governmental entities.

(2) The underlying goals of a statewide community college student organization shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Establishing a sustainable
 foundation for statewide community college student representation and advocacy.

(B) Promoting institutional and organizational memory.

(C) Ensuring and maintaining responsible community college student organizational oversight and decisionmaking.

(D) Strengthening regional approaches for community college student representation and coordination.

(E) Promoting and enhancing student opportunities for engagement in community college student issues and affairs.

(F) Providing for open and public transparency and accountability.

(G) Supporting
 student participation and engagement in statewide higher education policy and advocacy activities.

(c) Fees collected pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be annually distributed to the Board of Governors before February 1. The Board of Governors shall have custody of the moneys and shall, each year by April 15, distribute the moneys to the recognized statewide community college student organization if the recognized statewide community college student organization satisfies all of the following:

(1) Is established as a legal entity registered with the Secretary of State.

(2) Demonstrates compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and reporting requirements.

(3) Exercises prudent fiscal management by establishing generally accepted accounting controls and procedures.

(4) (A) Commencing after the first year it receives funding pursuant to this subdivision, completes an annual independent financial audit, the results of which shall be annually provided to the Board of Governors for review.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii) and after the first year funding is received, it shall be a condition for funding pursuant to this subdivision that the results of the annual audit identify no significant audit findings.

(ii) In no event shall funds be withheld from the statewide community college student organization unless the
 statewide community college student organization fails to address and correct any identified exceptions, concerns, errors, or deficiencies contained in the annual audit after being given a reasonable opportunity to do so.

(5) Meets the obligations and addresses the goals described in subdivision (b).

(d) Meetings of the recognized statewide community college student organization shall be open to the public and shall comply with the requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(e) (1) The chief fiscal officer of the community college shall have custody of the money collected pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (c), and the money shall be disbursed for the purposes described in subdivision (a) upon the order of the governing body of the student body association.

(2) The community college district shall annually prepare a summary of all revenue collected from the student representation fee and the expenditures of the proceeds of the student representation fee. The summary shall include the amount distributed to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges each year. The summary shall be presented at the community college district board meeting each year and posted to the community college district internet website.

(3) The community college district may retain a portion of the fees collected and deposited pursuant to this section that is equal to the actual cost of administering these fees up to, but not more than, 7 percent.

(f) A student may refuse to pay the student representation fee established under this section. The community college shall provide the student a means to refuse to pay the student representation fee on the same form that is used for collection of fees, which, as determined by the community college, shall be as nearly as practical in the same form as a model form prescribed by regulations of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(g) Any costs incurred by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to implement
 subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be reimbursed by the statewide community college student organization.

(h) If no statewide community college student organization that qualifies for funding in accordance with this section is recognized by the Board of Governors, the funds collected pursuant to this section shall be held by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges until a qualifying statewide community college student organization is recognized, or shall be returned to the source of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 79.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

76061.

A student who is elected to serve as an officer in the student government of a community college shall meet any of the following requirements:

(a) (1) The student shall be enrolled in the community college at the time of election, and throughout the student’s term, with a minimum of five semester units, or the equivalent quarter units.

(2) The student shall meet and maintain the minimum standards of scholarship prescribed for community college students by the community college district.

(b) The student shall be enrolled in
 an adult education program offered by a community college district pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50, at the time of the election and throughout the student’s term.

(c) The student is enrolled in the community college at the time of election, and throughout the student’s term, and is a disabled student, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 84850.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (AB 1736)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

76062.

The governing board of a community college district may authorize any organization composed entirely of students attending the colleges of the district to maintain any activities, including fundraising activities, as may be approved by the governing board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1238, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

76063.

The funds of any student body organization established in the public schools of any community college district shall, subject to approval of the governing board of the district, be deposited or invested in one or more of the following ways:

(a) Deposits in trust accounts of the centralized State Treasury system pursuant to Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code or in a bank or banks whose accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(b) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state-chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, if the associations are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully covered by the insurance.

(c) Purchase of any of the securities authorized for investment by Section 16430 of the Government Code or investment by the Treasurer in those securities.

(d) Participation in funds that are exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that are open exclusively to nonprofit colleges, universities, and independent schools.

(e) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in federal or state credit unions, if the credit unions are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully covered by the insurance.

The funds shall be expended subject to procedures that may be established by the student body organization subject to the approval of each of the following three persons, which shall be obtained each time before any of the funds may be expended: an employee or official of the community college district designated by the governing board, the certificated employee who is the designated adviser of the particular student body organization, and a representative of the particular student body organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76064.

In addition to deposit or investment pursuant to Section 76063, the funds of a student body organization may be loaned or invested in any of the following ways:

(a) Loans, with or without interest, to any student body organization established in another community college of the district for a period not to exceed three years.

(b) Invest money in permanent improvements to any community college district property including, but not limited to, buildings, automobile parking facilities, gymnasiums, swimming pools, stadia and playing fields, where those facilities, or portions thereof, are used for conducting student extracurricular activities or student spectator sports, or when those improvements are for the benefit of the student body. The investment shall be made on condition that the principal amount of the investment plus a reasonable amount of interest thereon shall be returned to the student body organization as provided herein. Any community college district approving the investment shall establish a fund in accordance with the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in which moneys derived from the rental of community college district property to student body organizations shall be deposited. Moneys collected by the governing board for automobile parking facilities as authorized by Section 76360 shall be deposited in the fund designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual if the parking facilities were provided for by investment of student body funds under this section. Moneys shall be returned to the student body organization as contemplated by this section exclusively from the special fund and only to the extent that there are moneys in the special fund. Whenever there are no outstanding obligations against the special fund, all moneys therein may be transferred to the general fund of the school district by action of the local governing board.

Two or more student body organizations of the same community college district may join together in making the investments in the same manner as is authorized herein for a single student body. Nothing herein shall be construed so as to limit the discretion of the local governing board in charging rental for use of community college district property by student body organizations as provided in Section 76060.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 31.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

76065.

The governing board of any community college district shall provide for the supervision of all funds raised by any student body or student organization using the name of the college.

The cost of supervision may constitute a proper charge against the funds of the district.

The governing board of a community college district may also provide for a continuing audit of student body funds with community college district personnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76067.

Any student political organization that is affiliated with the official youth division of any political party that is on the ballot of the State of California may hold meetings on a community college campus, and may distribute bulletins and circulars concerning its meetings, provided that there is no endorsement of that organization by the school authorities and no interference with the regular educational program of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 8.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. California Community College Student Federal and State Financial Aid Opportunity Act [76070. - 76071.]

76070.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Students of the California Community Colleges (CCC) receive federal Pell Grants at a rate significantly below the national community college average, and yet there is no indication that CCC students are less needy.

(2) California taxpayers pay into the federal Pell Grant program through federal taxes, but California students do not receive the benefits of the federal Pell Grant program at equal levels.

(3) California Community Colleges students receive federal Pell Grant funds at a rate significantly below undergraduate students at the University of California and the California State University, and again, there is no indication that CCC students are less needy.

(4) California maintains a low fee for CCC students, significantly lower than for University of California and California State University students and lower than the fee for other community college students in the nation, but this does not mean these students need fewer funds from the federal Pell Grant program. Federal Pell Grant funds do not pay community college fees; instead, federal Pell Grant funds are directed toward the remaining costs of attendance, called “indirect expenses” such as books, supplies, and room and board, which are just as high, and sometimes higher, for CCC students as for those other students in the nation and in other California colleges.

(5) Textbook prices are soaring, many CCC students live in high-cost urban areas, many CCC students support children, and financially needy CCC students struggle to make ends meet. A low participation rate in the largest federal grant program in California’s largest system of postsecondary education is unacceptable.

(6) The University of California (UC) and the California State University (CSU) conduct annual one-day conferences to educate California high school counselors about the policies, procedures, and services available in their respective systems. The California Community Colleges have not been funded to conduct similar statewide conferences, and must rely on local relationships that do not give all high schools access to consistent information. It is critical for student success in the community colleges that high school counselors are full partners in outreach and preparation, particularly as California is poised to hire and train many new counselors. This training will help counselors understand that all students need encouragement, information, and support services to pursue postsecondary education, not just those who are the most successful and traditionally viewed as headed to four-year colleges and universities.

(7) California Community Colleges financial aid programs received a major infusion of administrative allowances in the Budget Act of 2003 (Chapter 157 of the Statutes of 2003), which has resulted in substantial progress in assisting more students to receive federal Pell Grants; however, the average financial aid administrative support per student in the CCC segment, as compared to support for undergraduates in the UC and CSU systems is still significantly lower, while the administrative function is no less demanding, and in some aspects, more demanding, than the challenges faced by financial aid administrators in the UC and CSU systems.

(8) Some CCC students fail to receive federal Pell Grants because they do not enroll directly from high school or drop out after beginning attendance, or take very few units and work to support themselves and often to help their families. The income from these jobs, which cannot be sustained if a student desires to be a full-time student, causes students to become ineligible for federal Pell Grants. The colleges have the discretion, under federal law, to work with individuals to document the changes in their circumstances and justify eligibility, but to do so is labor-intensive and, thus, not a service that can be widely provided.

(9) Some CCC students are not able to secure financial information from their parents, or are reluctant to approach parents who live in poverty, and give up when they discover the financial aid application process involves their parents. The counseling and assistance necessary to make these highly needy students eligible is also labor-intensive and is, thus, difficult to provide without sufficient professional staff.

(10) Some students fail to qualify for federal Pell Grants because they have not yet declared an “eligible program” as their objective, and scarce counseling resources in the community colleges exacerbate this problem.

(11) Efforts to improve participation in federal student aid will also have a beneficial effect on participation in the Cal Grant Program, which currently provides only 10 percent of the financial aid funding in the community colleges. While there are participation barriers in the Cal Grant Program, such as early deadlines and limited funds for older students, that cannot be addressed by increased support services, some students will be reached who might not otherwise qualify for the Cal Grant Program.

(12) Efforts to improve participation in federal student aid will additionally have a beneficial effect on participation in the Board of Governors Enrollment Fee Waiver Program, which is critical to community college access.

(13) The CCC Chancellor’s Office maintains a financial aid unit, but it does not have the staffing capacity to undertake a wide range of systemwide initiatives and support. These initiatives could leverage millions of dollars in federal student assistance.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to support an array of initiatives to increase the number of CCC students receiving awards from the federal Pell Grant program, thereby helping to improve access to college for low-income students, helping improve their chances of success by having improved financial means to pay for escalating college costs, and the ability to devote more time to their education, improving the participation rate in other federal and state student aid programs, and helping Californians receive their fair share of the federal taxes paid to support federal financial aid programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

76071.

(a) The CCC Chancellor’s Office shall develop a statement that individual students will be asked to sign, which acknowledges that federal and state funds are available to assist with the costs of college and that information regarding these programs, and assistance in applying for those funds can be obtained at the financial aid office. The chancellor shall request the colleges to require students to sign this acknowledgment in the application for enrollment at all campuses of the California Community Colleges in the next regular local cycle in which those forms are printed and the next regular cycle in which electronic applications are updated.

(b) The CCC Chancellor’s Office shall develop a statement to individual students receiving the Board of Governors Enrollment Fee Waiver, who did not apply for federal student aid, informing them about the benefits of the federal programs, the application process, and the availability of assistance to apply. The chancellor shall request colleges to provide this statement to all students who meet this description.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Exercise of Free Expression [76120. - 76121.]

76120.

The governing board of a community college district shall adopt rules and regulations relating to the exercise of free expression by students upon the premises of each community college maintained by the district, which shall include reasonable provisions for the time, place, and manner of conducting such activities.

Such rules and regulations shall not prohibit the right of students to exercise free expression including, but not limited to, the use of bulletin boards, the distribution of printed materials or petitions, and the wearing of buttons, badges, or other insignia, except that expression which is obscene, libelous or slanderous according to current legal standards, or which so incites students as to create a clear and present danger of the commission of unlawful acts on community college premises, or the violation of lawful community college regulations, or the substantial disruption of the orderly operation of the community college, shall be prohibited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76121.

The governing board of each community college district shall require each community college maintained by the district, in administering any test or examination, to permit any student who is eligible to undergo the test or examination to do so, without penalty, at a time when that activity would not violate the student’s religious creed. This requirement shall not apply in the event that administering the test or examination at an alternate time would impose an undue hardship which could not reasonably have been avoided. In any court proceeding in which the existence of an undue hardship which could not reasonably have been avoided is an issue, the burden of proof shall be upon the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Nonresident Tuition [76140. - 76143.]

76140.

(a) A community college district may admit, and shall charge a tuition fee to, nonresident students, except that a community college district may exempt from all or parts of the fee any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (6), and shall exempt from all of the fee any person described in paragraph (4), (5), or (7):

(1) All nonresidents who enroll for six or fewer units. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be made on an individual basis.

(2) Any nonresident who is both a citizen and resident of a foreign country, if the nonresident has demonstrated a financial need for the exemption. Not more than 10 percent of the nonresident foreign students attending any community college
 district may be so exempted. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph may be made on an individual basis.

(3) (A) A student who, as of August 29, 2005, was enrolled, or admitted with an intention to enroll, in the fall term of the 2005–06 academic year in a regionally accredited institution of higher education in Alabama, Louisiana, or Mississippi, and who could not continue the student’s attendance at that institution as a direct consequence of damage sustained by that institution as a result of Hurricane Katrina.

(B) The chancellor shall develop guidelines for the implementation of this paragraph. These guidelines shall include standards for appropriate documentation of student eligibility to the extent feasible.

(C) This paragraph shall apply only to the 2005–06 academic year.

(4) A special part-time student, other than a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, admitted pursuant to Section 76001, 76003, or 76004.

(5) A nonresident student who is a United States citizen who resides in a foreign country, if that nonresident meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Demonstrates a financial need for the exemption.

(B) Has a parent or guardian who has been deported or was permitted to depart voluntarily under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act in accordance with Section 1229c of Title 8 of the United States Code. The student shall provide
 documents from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services evidencing the deportation or voluntary departure of the student’s parent or guardian.

(C) Moved abroad as a result of the deportation or voluntary departure specified in subparagraph (B).

(D) Lived in California immediately before moving abroad. The student shall provide information and evidence that demonstrates the student previously lived in California.

(E) Attended a public or private secondary school, as described in Sections 52 and 53, in the state for three or more years. The student shall provide documents that demonstrate the student’s secondary school attendance.

(F) Upon enrollment, the student will be in the student’s first academic year as a matriculated student in
 California public higher education, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66010, will be living in California, and will file an affidavit with the institution stating that the student intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.

(6) (A) A student who attends Lake Tahoe Community College and who has residence, pursuant to subparagraph (B), in one of the following communities in Nevada:

(i) Incline Village.

(ii) Kingsbury.

(iii) Round Hill.

(iv) Skyland.

(v) Stateline.

(vi) Zephyr Cove.

(B) Residence shall be determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41 of Division 5. A person shall have residence in one of the communities listed in subparagraph (A) if the person has lived in the community for more than one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) The governing board of the Lake Tahoe Community College District shall adopt rules and regulations for determining a student’s residence classification and for establishing procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification. No more than 200 students shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in any academic year.

(7) (A) A nonresident student who enrolls in a credit English as a second language
 (ESL) course at a California Community College and who is any of the following:

(i) A recent immigrant, as defined in Section 1101(a)(15) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(ii) A recent refugee, as defined in Section 1101(a)(42) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(iii) A person who has been granted asylum by the United States, as defined in Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(B) This exemption shall apply only to individuals who, upon entering the United States, settled in California and who have resided in California for less than one year.

(C) This exemption shall apply only to the tuition fee for credit ESL courses.

(b) A community college district may contract with a state, a county contiguous to California, the federal government, or a foreign country, or an agency thereof, for payment of all or a part of a nonresident student’s tuition fee.

(c) Nonresident students shall not be reported as full-time equivalent students (FTES) for state apportionment purposes, except as provided by subdivision (j) or another statute, in which case a nonresident tuition fee shall not be charged.

(d) The nonresident tuition fee shall be set by the governing board of each community college district not later than March 1 of each year for the succeeding fiscal year. The governing board of each community college district shall provide nonresident students with notice of nonresident tuition fee changes during the spring term before the fall term in which
 the change will take effect. Nonresident tuition fee increases shall be gradual, moderate, and predictable. The fee may be paid in installments, as determined by the governing board of the district.

(e) (1) The fee established by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to subdivision (d) shall represent for nonresident students enrolled in 30 semester units or 45 quarter units of credit per fiscal year one or more of the following:

(A) The amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education as defined by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in the preceding fiscal year increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the current fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES
 (including nonresident students) attending in the community college district in the preceding fiscal year. However, if for the community college district’s preceding fiscal year FTES of all students attending in the community college district in noncredit courses is equal to, or greater than, 10 percent of the community college district’s total FTES attending in the community college district, the community college district may substitute the data for expense of education in grades 13 and 14 and FTES in grades 13 and 14 attending in the community college district.

(B) The expense of education in the preceding fiscal year of all community college districts increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending all community college districts during the
 preceding fiscal year. However, if the amount calculated under this paragraph for the succeeding fiscal year is less than the amount established for the current fiscal year or for any of the past four fiscal years, the community college district may set the nonresident tuition fee at the greater of the current or any of the past four-year amounts.

(C) An amount not to exceed the fee established by the governing board of any contiguous community college district.

(D) An amount not to exceed the amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education, but in no case less than the statewide average as set forth in subparagraph (B).

(E) An amount no greater than the average of the nonresident tuition fees of public community colleges of no less than 12 states that are comparable to
 California in cost of living. The determination of comparable states shall be based on a composite cost-of-living index as determined by the United States Department of Labor or a cooperating government agency.

(2) The additional revenue generated by the increased nonresident tuition permitted under the amendments made to this subdivision during the 2009–10 Regular Session shall be used to expand and enhance services to resident students. The admission of nonresident students shall not come at the expense of resident enrollment.

(f) The governing board of each community college district also shall adopt a tuition fee per unit of credit for nonresident students enrolled in more or less than 15 units of credit per term by dividing the fee determined in subdivision (e) by 30 for colleges operating on the semester system and 45 for colleges operating on the quarter system and rounding
 to the nearest whole dollar. The same rate shall be uniformly charged to nonresident students attending any terms or sessions maintained by the community college. The rate charged shall be the rate established for the fiscal year in which the term or session ends.

(g) Any loss in community college district revenue generated by the nonresident tuition fee shall not be offset by additional state funding.

(h) Any community college district that has fewer than 1,500 FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may exempt students from that state, or may exempt students from those states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for
 nonresident students.

(i) Any community college district that has more than 1,500, but fewer than 3,001, FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may, in any one fiscal year, exempt up to 100 FTES from that state or from states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.

(j) The attendance of nonresident students who are exempted pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), or pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a), from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students may be reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes. Any nonresident student
 reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes who is exempt pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), or pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), shall pay a per-unit fee that is one and one-half times the amount of the fee established for residents pursuant to Section 76300. That fee shall be included in the FTES adjustments described in Section 76300 for purposes of computing apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1232)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See later operative version, as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

76140.

(a) A community college district may admit, and shall charge a tuition fee to, nonresident students, except that a community college district may exempt from all or parts of the fee any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (6), or (8) and shall exempt from all of the fee any person described in paragraph (4), (5), or (7):

(1) All nonresidents who enroll for six or fewer units. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be made on an individual basis.

(2) Any nonresident who is both a citizen and resident of a foreign country, if the nonresident has demonstrated a financial need for the exemption. Not more than 10 percent of the nonresident foreign students attending any community
 college district may be so exempted. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph may be made on an individual basis. A nonresident student exempted pursuant to paragraph (8) is not exempted pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) (A) A student who, as of August 29, 2005, was enrolled, or admitted with an intention to enroll, in the fall term of the 2005–06 academic year in a regionally accredited institution of higher education in Alabama, Louisiana, or Mississippi, and who could not continue the student’s attendance at that institution as a direct consequence of damage sustained by that institution as a result of Hurricane Katrina.

(B) The chancellor shall develop guidelines for the implementation of this paragraph. These guidelines shall include standards for appropriate documentation of student eligibility to the extent feasible.

(C) This paragraph shall apply only to the 2005–06 academic year.

(4) A special part-time student, other than a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, admitted pursuant to Section 76001, 76003, or 76004.

(5) A nonresident student who is a United States citizen who resides in a foreign country, if that nonresident meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Demonstrates a financial need for the exemption.

(B) Has a parent or guardian who has been deported or was permitted to depart voluntarily under the federal
 Immigration and Nationality Act in accordance with Section 1229c of Title 8 of the United States Code. The student shall provide documents from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services evidencing the deportation or voluntary departure of the student’s parent or guardian.

(C) Moved abroad as a result of the deportation or voluntary departure specified in subparagraph (B).

(D) Lived in California immediately before moving abroad. The student shall provide information and evidence that demonstrates the student previously lived in California.

(E) Attended a public or private secondary school, as described in Sections 52 and 53, in the state for three or more years. The student shall provide documents that demonstrate the student’s secondary school attendance.
